src/phonology/sms-phon.twolc
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering o:å"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in poorrâd
!2016-05-10! o:å <=> OnSetC    _ o: (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  %^VOWLower:  ;
!2016-05-10!!! poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 __eat/syödä__
!2016-05-10!!!€ poo0rr%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ på0ʹrr000%>e
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC o: _     (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  %^VOWLower:  ;
!2016-05-10!!! poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 __eat/syödä__
!2016-05-10!!!€ poorr%^VOWLower
!2016-05-10!!!€ påårr0
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC    _  (%^1VOW:)   (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]   %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC _ %^1VOW:å (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^V2VV:   %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded > joordam
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC    _ (%^1VOW:) (u:|i:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC    _ (%^1VOW:) ((ʹ:) (v:u|j:i)) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering i:e"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in viǯǯâd
!2016-05-10! i:e <=>
!2016-05-10!   OnSetC _ i: (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (%^V2VV:)  %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC _ [õ:â|õ:ä|â:ä|e:ä|e:â] (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (e: s:)  %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!           OnSetC i: _   (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!           OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (%^V2VV:)  %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!! viǯǯâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!2016-05-10!!!€ vi%^1VOW0ǯǯ%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ ve0ʹǯǯ00%>e
!2016-05-10!!! viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg2 __fetch/noutaa__
!2016-05-10!!!€ vi%^1VOWǯǯ%^V2VV%^VOWLower%>as 
!2016-05-10!!!€ veeǯǯ00%>as
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!! juʹrdded > joordam
!2016-05-10!           OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) (u:|i:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!           OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) ((ʹ:) (v:u|j:i)) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!  OnSetC _ [â:ä|â:ẹ|â:e] (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) %^LowerI2E: ;
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: __milk/maito__
!2016-05-10!!!€ meâ0lkk%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL
!2016-05-10!!!€ mieʹlǩǩ000
!2016-05-10!  OnSetC _ [â:ä|â:ẹ] (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ |Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!! cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ ciâkˈkez%^Pen%^VOWLower%^PenVow2a
!2016-05-10!!!€ ceäkˈkaz000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering a:ä"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in viǯǯâd
!2016-05-10!!! {{{
!2016-05-10! a:ä <=> OnSetC    _ a:ä (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC a: _     (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC    _    (%^1VOW:) (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!! juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC _ %^1VOW:   (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (%^V2VV: )  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) BetweenPALNoAndMorph ;
!2016-05-10!! juʹrdded > joordam
!2016-05-10!!         OnSetC     _ (%^1VOW:) (u:|i:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC     _ (%^1VOW:) ((ʹ:) (v:u|j:i)) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering u:o"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in uʹvdded
!2016-05-10! u:o <=>
!2016-05-10!        OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:) v: (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) [n n: |d d:|l l:|r r:|ʒ ʒ:|ǯ ǯ:|j j:] (%^V2VV:) %^VOWLower:  ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!! uʹvdded+V+Cond+Pl3 __to give__
!2016-05-10!!!€ u%^1VOWvdd%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2VY%>če
!2016-05-10!!!€ ooud0000%>če
!2016-05-10!!! uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!2016-05-10!!!€ u%^1VOWvdd%^VOWLower%^XYY2VYY
!2016-05-10!!!€ o0udd00
!2016-05-10!!! vuʹvll+N+Sg+Ill: voulla
!2016-05-10!!!€ vuvll%^VOWLower%^PALNo%^XYY2VYY%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ voull000%>a
!2016-05-10!  OnSetC _ [u:o|u:0] (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (%^VV2V:)  %^VOWLower: (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) (%^KK2GG:|%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!!! kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 __hear/kuulla__
!2016-05-10!!!€ kuu0ll%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2C%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ ko0ʹl00000%>e
!2016-05-10!        OnSetC u: _   (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+|r d d:]  %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) (%^KK2GG:|%^CC2C:|%^XYY2XY:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!!! suukkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: __row/soutaa__
!2016-05-10!!!€ suukk%^VOWLower%^KK2GG%>as
!2016-05-10!!!€ sooǥǥ00%>as
!2016-05-10!       OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:| %{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) [CNoV: Cns:* |Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: ; 
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 __think__
!2016-05-10!!!€ ju%^1VOWrdd%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>am
!2016-05-10!!!€ joord0000%>am
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 __think__
!2016-05-10!!!€ ju%^1VOW0rdd%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ jo0ʹrdd00%>e
!2016-05-10!! uʹvdded+V+Ind+Pl3: ouʹdde 
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10! OnSetC  _ (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:)  v:u (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10! OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) %{VU%}: (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!! stuuʹl+N+Sg+Ill: __chair/tuoli__
!2016-05-10!!!€ stu%^1VOW%{VU%}l%^V2VV%^VOWLower%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ stooul00%>a
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
!2016-05-10!!! juʹrdded > joordam
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering u:õ "
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving
!2016-05-10! u:õ <=>
!2016-05-10!       u: _  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] ( Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: ) %^U2Õ: ;
!2016-05-10!       OnsetC _ (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] [BetweenStemAndHeight | Vow: Cns:* PenBetweenStemAndHeight %^Pen: ] %^U2Õ: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ ču%^1VOWkk%^V2VV%^U2Õ%>až
!2016-05-10!!!€ čõõkk00%>až
!2016-05-10!    OnSetC  _ u: (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  %^U2Õ: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel lowering õ:â "
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in viǯǯâd
!2016-05-10! õ:â <=>
!2016-05-10!       i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: [ BetweenPALNoAndMorph |%^PAL:|%^PALNo:] ;
!2016-05-10!!! riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 __to whip__
!2016-05-10!!!€ riõkˈk%^VOWLower#
!2016-05-10!!!€ reâkˈk0#
!2016-05-10!       õ: _  (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ mõõ0nn%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ mâ0ʹnn000%>e
!2016-05-10!    OnSetC  _ õ: (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ mõõnn%^VOWLower%^CC2C%>as
!2016-05-10!!!€ mâân000%>as
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!! juʹrdded > joordam
!2016-05-10!   OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:)  (u:|i:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ; 
!2016-05-10!   OnSetC _ (%^1VOW:) ((ʹ:) (v:u|j:i)) (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) RBound ;
!2016-05-10!! diphthong opening after u
!2016-05-10!        u _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: [ BetweenPALNoAndMorph |%^PAL:|%^PALNo:] ;
!2016-05-10!!! kuõskkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!2016-05-10!!!€ kuõskk%^VOWLower
!2016-05-10!!!€ kuâskk0
!2016-05-10!

!! !diphthongs

!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after u å:ä"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in kuåccâd kuäʹcce
!2016-05-10!!! = a>ä lowering clockwise
!2016-05-10! å:ä <=> u _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] BetweenStemAndHeight %^VOWLower: (%^PALNo:|%^PAL:) BetweenPALNoAndMorph ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ kuå0c0c%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ kuäʹcˈc000%>e
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after i:e e:ä"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
!2016-05-10! e:ä <=> [i:|u] _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (e: s:) %^VOWLower: (%^PALNo:|(%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:) [RBound|%^RmVow:|%^VC:] ;
!2016-05-10!!! vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuäʹlǧǧa
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Vowel in second syllable e:a"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: ceäkˈkaz
!2016-05-10! e:a <=> 
!2016-05-10!  OnSetC _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:*] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^PenVow2a: ;
!2016-05-10!!! cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ ciâkˈkez%^Pen%^VOWLower%^PenVow2a
!2016-05-10!!!€ ceäkˈkaz000
!2016-05-10!

!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening i:e â:ä for â:ä "
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
!2016-05-10! â:ä <=>
!2016-05-10! u _ i (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: ;
!2016-05-10!!!vueiʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!2016-05-10!!!€ vuâinn%^VOWLower
!2016-05-10!!!€ vuäinn0
!2016-05-10! i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: (%^PALNo:| %^PAL:)  ;
!2016-05-10! i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: %^VOWLower: (%^Pen: %^PALNo:| %^Pen: %^PAL:)  ;
!2016-05-10! u _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^PALÄ:  ;
!2016-05-10!!! vueʹlǧǧed+Use/NG+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 __leave/lähteä__
!2016-05-10!!!€ vuâ0lgg%^PALÄ%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ vuäʹlǧǧ00%>e
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after i:e e:â"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in pi%{EÂ%}ʹǩǩ:peâkka
!2016-05-10!!! {{{
!2016-05-10! %{EÂ%}:â <=> i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: %^PALNo:  RBound ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after u e:â"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuâʹlǧǧe
!2016-05-10!!! {{{
!2016-05-10! e:â <=> [u|i:] _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] (e: s:) %^VOWLower: %^VOWBack: ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!
!! !Vowel backing

!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening after u e:õ"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuõʹlǧǧem
!2016-05-10!!! {{{
!2016-05-10! e:õ <=> u _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWBack: ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!" u å:õ"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10!!! = a>ä lowering clockwise
!2016-05-10!!! {{{
!2016-05-10! å:õ <=> u _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWRaise: ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!!!€ puått%^VOWRaise%>u
!2016-05-10!!!€ puõtt0%>u
!2016-05-10!
